Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Chapter 20. Municipal Officers and Employees.

Collateral references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 205 et seq.

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, § 1 et seq.

62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 328 et seq.

67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, § 1 et seq.

Validity, construction, and effect of municipal residency requirements for teachers, principals, and other school employees. 75 ALR4th 272.